pt-PT: Compatibilidade com o desporto de bilhar: Bumper Pool; Bilhar francês (Carambola); Bilhar inglês; Pool; Snooker; Outro
zh-TW: 撞球運動相容性: 障礙撞球; 開侖撞球; 英式撞球; 花式撞球; 斯諾克; 其他
ru: Совместимость с видом спорта на киях: Бамперный пул; Карамболь; Английский бильярд; Пул; Снукер; Другое
fr: Compatibilité avec les sports de billard: Bumper pool; Carambole; Billard anglais; Pool; Snooker; Autre
es: Compatibilidad con deportes de taco: Bumper pool; Carambola; Billar inglés; Pool; Snooker; Otro
it: Compatibilità con lo sport della stecca: Bumper pool; Carambola; Biliardo inglese; Pool; Snooker; Altro
nb: Kompatibilitet med køsport: Bumper pool; Karambole; Engelsk biljard; Pool; Snooker; Annet
cs: Kompatibilita s tágo sportem: Bumper Pool; Karambol; Anglický kulečník; Pool; Snooker; Ostatní
tr: İsteka sporu uyumluluğu: Bumper bilardo; Karambol; İngiliz bilardosu; Amerikan bilardosu; Snooker; Diğer
pl: Kompatybilność ze sportem bilardowym: Bumper pool; Karambol; Bilard angielski; Bilard (pool); Snooker; Inne
th: ความเข้ากันได้กับประเภทกีฬาที่ใช้ไม้คิว: บัมเปอร์พูล; แครอม; อิงลิชบิลเลียด; พูล; สนุกเกอร์; อื่นๆ
ko: 호환 큐 스포츠: 범퍼 풀; 캐롬; 잉글리시 빌리어드; 풀; 스누커; 기타
pt-BR: Compatibilidade com o esporte de bilhar: Bumper Pool; Carambola (Carom); Bilhar inglês; Pool; Snooker; Outro
bg-BG: Съвместим спорт с щека: Бъмпър пул; Карамбол; Английски билярд; Пул; Снукър; Други
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost s Cue sportovima: Bumper biljar; Karambol; Engleski biljar; Pool biljar; Snooker; Ostalo
da: Kompatibilitet med køsport: Bumper pool; Karambole; Engelsk billard; Pool; Snooker; Andet
vi: Khả năng tương thích với môn thể thao bi-a: Bida lỗ cản; Bida carom; Bida Anh; Bida lỗ; Snooker; Khác
nl: Keusport compatibiliteit: Bumperpool; Carambole; Engels biljart; Pool; Snooker; Overig
sl-SI: Združljivost s športom z biljardnimi palicami: Bumper pool; Karambol; Angleški biljard; Biljard; Snooker; Drugo
sv: Kompatibilitet med kösport: Bumper pool; Karambol; Engelsk biljard; Pool; Snooker; Övrigt
en: Cue sport compatibility: Bumper Pool; Carom; English Billiards; Pool; Snooker; Other
el: Συμβατότητα με αθλήματα στέκας: Bumper Pool; Γαλλικό μπιλιάρδο (Carom); Αγγλικό μπιλιάρδο; Pool; Σνούκερ; Άλλο
zh-CN: 适配的台球运动: 碰碰台球; 开仑台球; 英式台球; 普尔台球; 斯诺克; 其他
ro-RO: Compatibilitate cu sportul cu tac: Bumper Pool; Carambol; Biliard englezesc; Pool; Snooker; Altele
fi: Soveltuvat biljardilajit: Bumper pool; Karamboli; Englantilainen biljardi; Pool; Snooker; Muu
hu: Dákósporttal való kompatibilitás: Bumper pool; Karambol; Angol biliárd; Pool; Snooker; Egyéb
lt-LT: Suderinamumas su lazdų sportu: „Bumper“ pulas; Karambolis; Angliškas biliardas; Pulas; Snukeris; Kita
de: Kompatibilität mit Queue-Sportarten: Bumper Pool; Karambolage; English Billiards; Poolbillard; Snooker; Sonstige
sk-SK: Kompatibilita s tágovým športom: Bumper Pool; Karambol; Anglický biliard; Pool; Snooker; Iné
ja: キュー競技との互換性: バンパープール; キャロム; イングリッシュビリヤード; プール; スヌーカー; その他